Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4346.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. (1) The tax imposed under section 14 must be allocated as follows: (a) Thirty percent to the city in which the internet gaming operator licensee's casino is located, for use in connection with the following: (i) The hiring, training, and deployment of street patrol officers in that city. (ii) Neighborhood development programs designed to create jobs in that city with a focus on blighted neighborhoods. (iii) Public safety programs such as emergency medical services, fire department programs, and street lighting in that city. (iv) Anti-gang and youth development programs in that city. (v) Other programs that are designed to contribute to the improvement of the quality of life in that city. (vi) Relief to the taxpayers of the city from 1 or more taxes or fees imposed by the city. (vii) The costs of capital improvements in that city. (viii) Road repairs and improvements in that city. (b) Sixty-five percent Sixty-six percent to this state to be deposited in the fund. (c) Five percent Four percent to the Michigan agriculture equine industry development fund created under section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320. However, if the 5% 4% allocated under this subdivision to the Michigan agriculture equine industry development fund created under section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320, exceeds $3,000,000.00 in a the following amounts in the given fiscal year, the amount in excess of $3,000,000.00 the amount listed must be allocated and deposited in the fund created under section 16: . (i) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, $9,000,000.00. (ii) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $12,000,000.00. (iii) For the fiscal years ending September 30, 2028, and each September 30 after that date, $15,000,000.00. (2) By September 30, 2020 and each September 30 after that date, if the combined amount of money received in the preceding city fiscal year by the city in which the internet gaming operator's casino is located from money allocated under subsection (1)(a), from the wagering tax allocated under section 12 of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212, from the wagering tax allocated under section 15 of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.415, and all payments received under existing development agreements with internet gaming operators, is less than $183,000,000.00, the board shall distribute from the fund to the city in which the internet gaming operator's casino is located an amount equal to the difference between $183,000,000.00 and the combined amount of money the city in which the internet gaming operator's casino is located received in the preceding fiscal year from money allocated under subsection (1)(a), from the wagering tax allocated under section 12 of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212, from the wagering tax allocated under section 15 of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.415, and all payments received by the city under existing development agreements with internet gaming operators. The calculations set forth in this subsection must not include any payments made under section 14(5) or any payments made under section 13(1) of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.213, or any payments made under section 14(5) of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.414. However, the total amount the city in which the internet gaming operator's casino is located receives for the preceding fiscal year under subsection (1)(a) and this subsection must not be more than 55% of the total received from the tax imposed under section 14 in the state fiscal year. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01712'25) or House Bill No. 4347 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.